Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. General Provisions

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-301.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Charter” means the commissioner’s grant of authority to any supervised trust company to act and operate in that capacity;

“Chartered family trust company” means a family trust company that has been granted a charter by the commissioner to act and operate pursuant to this chapter;

“Collateral kinship” means a relationship that is not lineal, but stems from a common ancestor;

“Commissioner” means the state banking commissioner;

“Designated relative” means:

With respect to a chartered family trust company, the individual, whether living or deceased, who is listed as the designated relative in a charter application for a charter under this chapter. A chartered family trust company may have no more than two (2) designated relatives;

With respect to a private family trust company, the person, whether living or deceased, who is listed as the designated relative in a written document by the private family trust company that is maintained with the private family trust company records. A private family trust company may have no more than one (1) designated relative.

“Family affiliate” means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other entity with respect to which one (1) or more family members own, directly or indirectly, more than fifty percent (50%) of the entity or possess, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the entity’s management and policies, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, power of direction or otherwise;

“Family member” means:

Each designated relative;

Any person within the tenth degree of lineal kinship of a designated relative;

Any person within the ninth degree of collateral kinship of a designated relative;

The spouse and any former spouse of the designated relative or of any person qualifying as a family member pursuant to subparagraph (B) or (C) of this paragraph;

Any person within the fifth degree of lineal kinship of a spouse or former spouse specified in subparagraph (D) of this paragraph;

A family affiliate and the officers, managers and directors of a family affiliate;

A key employee of a family affiliate or former key employee of a family affiliate;

A trust established or funded by any one (1) or more family members or any trustee, advisor or other person assisting with the administration of the trust;

A trust established or funded by a person who is not a family member if the noncharitable beneficiaries consist entirely of one (1) or more family members;

A charitable trust, entity or other organization of which one (1) or more family members is a settlor, incorporator, organizer, member of the board of directors, trustee or a donor of a substantial portion of its assets;

For purposes of this definition:

A legally adopted person shall be treated as a natural child of the adoptive parents;

A stepchild shall be treated as a natural child of the family member who is or was the stepparent of that child;

A foster child or an individual who was a minor when a family member became his or her legal guardian shall be treated as a natural child of the family member appointed as foster parent or guardian;

Children of a spouse of a family member shall be treated as a natural child of that family member;

Each key employee, spouse of a key employee, former key employee and spouse of a former key employee shall be treated as a natural child of the ninth degree of lineal kinship of the designated relative; and

Degrees are calculated by adding the number of steps from the designated relative through each person to the family member either directly, in case of lineal kinship, or through the common ancestor, in the case of collateral kinship.

“Family trust company” means a chartered family trust company or a private family trust company that engages in trust company business exclusively for one (1) or more family members and does not engage in trust company business with the general public;

“Fiduciary” means acting as executor, administrator, guardian or conservator of an estate or as an assignee, receiver or trustee or acting in any other fiduciary or representative capacity;

“Key employee” means a natural person, including any spouse of an officer, manager or director who holds a joint, community property or other similar shared ownership interest with that officer, manager or director, who is an executive officer, director, manager, trustee, general partner or person serving in a similar capacity for a family affiliate who, in connection with his regular functions or duties, participates in the investment activities of a family affiliate, provided that the person has been performing functions and duties for or on behalf of a family trust company for at least twelve (12) months. For purposes of this definition, a family trust company may designate as a key employee an individual who is a former employee of the family trust company; provided, however, that the number of persons designated as key employees shall not exceed twenty (20) within the trust;

“Lineal kinship” means a family member who is in the direct line of ascent or descent from a designated relative;

“Organizational instrument” means the articles of incorporation for a corporation or the articles of organization for a limited liability company;

“Private family trust company” means a family trust company that is not a chartered family trust company and is not subject to regulation by the Wyoming division of banking;

“Public trust company” means a trust company that has been granted a charter by the commissioner to engage in trust company business with the general public;

“Supervised trust company” means any public trust company or chartered family trust company but does not include a private family trust company;

“Trust company” means a corporation or limited liability company that is incorporated or organized in this state or a foreign corporation or limited liability company that is qualified to do business in this state and that is engaged in trust company business;

“Trust company branch” means a place of business within this state that engages in trust company business;

“Trust company business” means the holding out by a person, by advertising, solicitation or other means, that such person is available to act as a fiduciary in this state and accepting and undertaking to act as a fiduciary in the regular course of its business. For purposes of this chapter, a person or entity does not engage in trust company business solely by:

Rendering services as an attorney-at-law in the performance of his duties;

Acting as trustee under a deed of trust made only as security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;

Acting as a trustee in bankruptcy or as a receiver;

Holding trusts of real estate for the primary purpose of subdivision, development or sale or to facilitate any business transaction with respect to such real estate, provided the person is not regularly engaged in the business of acting as a trustee for such trusts;

Holding assets as trustee of trusts created for charitable purposes;

Receiving rents and proceeds of sale as a licensed real estate broker on behalf of a principal;

Engaging in securities transactions as a dealer or salesman registered under W.S.

17-4-101

through

17-4-701

;

Acting as guardian, conservator, special conservator, trustee or personal representative pursuant to a court order or other statutory authority;

Acting as trustee of a statutory trust created under the Wyoming Statutory Trust Act;

Acting as a custodian, unless the activities involve a substantial exercise of discretion as determined by the commissioner; or

Acting as a trust advisor or trust protector, as defined in W.S. 4-10-103(a).

“Trust service office” means any other office or other place of business where the supervised trust company exercises its administrative duties but does not conduct trust company business.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 102, § 1, effective March 13, 2020; 2021 ch. 3, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2020 amendment,

in (a)(ix) substituted “receiver or trustee or acting in any other” for “receiver, depositary, trustee, custodian or in any other”; and added (a)(xviii)(K) and (a)(xviii)(M) and made a related change.

Laws 2020, ch. 102, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2020.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a)(xvi), added "incorporated or" preceding "organized," "in this state" following "organized," "a foreign corporation or limited liability company that is" preceding "qualified to," and deleted "as a trust company" following "in this state."

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-302.
Naming convention; advertisement of trust company.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person or entity shall advertise, issue or circulate any paper or exhibit any sign, using the term “trust company” unless the person or entity has fully complied with this chapter and has qualified as a supervised trust company.

No person or entity wishing to organize as a private family trust company shall use the term “trust company” in its name without further specifying in its name that the entity is a “private family trust company.”

Neither a private family trust company nor a chartered family trust company formed and doing business under the laws of this state or any other state shall advertise its services to the public.

History.

Renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

13-5-207

by 2019 ch. 13, § 3, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section” at the beginning, substituted “the person or entitiy has” for “they have” preceding “fully complied,” and substituted “chapter and has qualified as a supervised trust company” for “act of W.S.

13-5-101

through

13-5-113

” at the end; in (b), inserted “company” following “private family trust,” substituted “entity” for “company” following “name that the,” deleted “single” preceding “family trust company,” and deleted “unless they have fully complied with this act or W.S.

13-5-101

through

13-5-113

” from the end; and in (c), inserted “private” following “Neither a” at the beginning.

§ 13-5-303.
Trust company organized as limited liability company; applicability.

A trust company organized as a limited liability company shall be subject to all of the same laws and regulations that relate to a trust company organized as a corporation. All managers, officers and employees of a trust company organized as a limited liability company shall be subject to the same duties and liabilities that apply to directors, officers and employees of a trust company organized as a corporation. Any reference made in this chapter only to a corporation, director or shareholder shall also apply to a limited liability company, manager or member.

History.

2019 ch. 13, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 13, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 13-5-304.
Applicability of chapter.

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this chapter.

History.

2019 ch. 61, § 2, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 61, § 5, makes the act effective January 1, 2020.